Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,147
Public officers; malfeasance; ouster.

Any county attorney or prosecuting officer, sheriff, mayor, police officer, or police commissioner, or other officer, who shall willfully fail, neglect or refuse to enforce any law which it is made his duty to enforce shall thereby forfeit his office and may be removed therefrom.

Laws 1907, c. 87, § 1, p. 306;

R.S.1913, § 8354;

C.S.1922, § 9306;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,138;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,147;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 143.

To willfully fail, neglect, or refuse to enforce a law involves more than oversight or carelessness or voluntary neglect. State ex rel. Thompson v. Donahue, 91 Neb. 311, 135 N.W. 1030 (1912).